District of Columbia statutes.
43-131

Act for promotion of anatomical science not affected by crematory law.

Nothing in §§ 43-129 to 43-131 shall be construed as repealing or in any way modifying any of the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 3.

Apr. 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 124, ch. 1641, § 3
1973 Ed., § 27-131.
1981 Ed., § 27-131.